District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.78

POWER — Amount of assistance.

POWER payments shall be made in accordance with § 4-205.52.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 578
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.78.

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

See notes to § 4-205.69.